Colorado, session 2026A, HB1247.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-3-1104, add
(1)(uu) as follows:
10-3-1104. Unfair methods of competition - unfair or deceptive
practices - rules - definitions.
(1) The following are defined as unfair methods of competition
and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the business of insurance:
(uu) A WILLFUL OR REPEATED VIOLATION OF SECTION 10-4-125
CONCERNING THE APPRAISAL CLAUSE PROCESS FOR HOMEOWNER'S
INSURANCE POLICIES OR CONTRACTS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 10-4-125 as
follows:
-2- HB26-1247

10-4-125. Homeowner's insurance - dispute of claims - damage
validation through third-party assessment - appraisal process in
policies and contracts - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "APPRAISER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(I) LICENSED IN THE STATE AS:
(A) A CONTRACTOR IN THE BUILDING AND CONSTRUCTION TRADES;
(B) AN INSPECTOR;
(C) A PUBLIC ADJUSTER; OR
(D) AN ATTORNEY;
(II) AN IN-HOUSE INSURANCE COMPANY ADJUSTER; OR
(III) AN INDEPENDENT INSURANCE ADJUSTER.
(b) "COVERED PROPERTY" MEANS A NAMED PROPERTY UNDER A
POLICY OR CONTRACT OF HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE.
(c) "FAIR AND COMPETENT" MEANS AN APPRAISER OR UMPIRE:
(I) IS NOT A PARTY TO THE INSURANCE POLICY OR CONTRACT;
(II) DOES NOT HAVE A FINANCIAL INTEREST THAT IS CONDITIONED
UPON THE OUTCOME OF THE APPRAISAL;
(III) IS NOT A CURRENT EMPLOYEE OF THE INSURED OR INSURER;
AND
(IV) IS NOT A FAMILY MEMBER OR AN INDIVIDUAL WITH WHOM THE
INSURED HAS A PERSONAL RELATIONSHIP THAT COULD REASONABLY
SUGGEST BIAS.
(d) "HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 10-4-101.5 AND INCLUDES A POLICY OR CONTRACT THAT COVERS
A SINGLE-FAMILY HOME THAT IS USED AS A PRIMARY RESIDENCE, A
-3- HB26-1247

SECONDARY RESIDENCE, OR A RENTAL PROPERTY.
(e) "INSURED" MEANS A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICYHOLDER
OR THEIR DESIGNATED REPRESENTATIVE.
(f) "INSURER" MEANS AN INSURER OF A POLICY OR CONTRACT OF
HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE ON THE COVERED PROPERTY AND INCLUDES
THE FAIR PLAN ASSOCIATION CREATED IN SECTION 10-4-1804.
(g) "THIRD-PARTY DAMAGE ASSESSMENT" MEANS A WRITTEN
DAMAGE ASSESSMENT OR REPAIR ESTIMATE FROM A QUALIFIED,
INDEPENDENT COMPANY OF AN INSURED'S CHOICE.
(h) "UMPIRE" MEANS AN APPRAISER OR RETIRED JUDGE SELECTED
JOINTLY BY AN INSURED'S APPRAISER AND AN INSURER'S APPRAISER, OR BY
A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, AFTER AN APPRAISAL CLAUSE IS
INVOKED.
(2) (a) WITHIN FOURTEEN DAYS AFTER AN INSURER HAS
INVESTIGATED A CLAIM AND MADE AN INITIAL COVERAGE
DETERMINATION, THE INSURER SHALL PROVIDE TO THE INSURED, IN
WRITING, EVIDENCE SUPPORTING THE INITIAL COVERAGE DETERMINATION,
INCLUDING POLICY OR CONTRACT PROVISIONS RELIED UPON BY THE
INSURER, AND ADJUSTER OR CONSULTANT REPORTS PROCURED DURING
THE INVESTIGATION.
(b) IF AN INSURED DISPUTES THE INSURER'S INITIAL COVERAGE
DETERMINATION, THE INSURED MAY SUBMIT THIRD-PARTY DAMAGE
ASSESSMENTS. UPON RECEIPT OF AN INSURED'S THIRD-PARTY DAMAGE
ASSESSMENT, THE INSURER SHALL CONSIDER THE INFORMATION PROVIDED
IN THE DAMAGE ASSESSMENT IN GOOD FAITH AND CONDUCT AN ON-SITE
REINSPECTION OF THE PROPERTY WITHIN FORTY-FIVE DAYS AFTER RECEIPT
OF THE THIRD-PARTY DAMAGE ASSESSMENT.
-4- HB26-1247

(c) WITHIN TWENTY-EIGHT DAYS AFTER A REINSPECTION OF THE
PROPERTY REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION
IS COMPLETED, THE INSURER SHALL EITHER APPROVE THE CLAIM OR
PROVIDE VALID AND SPECIFIC REASONS FOR DENIAL OF THE CLAIM IN
REFERENCE TO THE POLICY OR CONTRACT.
(3) IF THERE IS A DISPUTE OVER THE AMOUNT OF LOSS, EITHER THE
INSURED OR THE INSURER MAY MAKE A WRITTEN REQUEST TO INVOKE THE
APPRAISAL CLAUSE OF THE POLICY OR CONTRACT, AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(4) (a) EACH POLICY OR CONTRACT OF HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE
ISSUED OR RENEWED IN THE STATE ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, MUST
INCLUDE A CLAUSE AUTHORIZING AN INSURER OR INSURED TO INVOKE A
MANDATORY AND BINDING APPRAISAL PROCESS IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SECTION TO SETTLE A DISPUTE OVER THE AMOUNT OF LOSS, CAUSATION,
OR NECESSARY SCOPE OF REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT OF PROPERTY. THE
APPRAISAL PROCESS DOES NOT DETERMINE COVERAGE UNDER THE TERMS
OF THE POLICY OR CONTRACT.
(b) THE APPRAISAL CLAUSE MUST INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING
PROVISIONS:
(I) THE RIGHT OF THE INSURED AND INSURER TO CHOOSE THEIR
OWN FAIR AND COMPETENT APPRAISER WITHIN TWENTY-ONE DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT OF THE WRITTEN REQUEST TO INVOKE THE APPRAISAL CLAUSE;
(II) THE JOINT SELECTION OF A FAIR AND COMPETENT UMPIRE BY
THE INSURED'S APPRAISER AND THE INSURER'S APPRAISER PRIOR TO THE
PARTIES' APPRAISERS COMMENCING DISCUSSION OR NEGOTIATIONS UNDER
THE APPRAISAL CLAUSE. IF THE INSURED'S APPRAISER AND THE INSURER'S
APPRAISER CANNOT AGREE TO THE SELECTION OF AN UMPIRE WITHIN
-5- HB26-1247

TWENTY-ONE DAYS, EITHER PARTY MAY PETITION A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION IN THE JURISDICTION IN WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED
TO SELECT AN UMPIRE FROM AMONG THOSE PRESENTED BY THE INSURED'S
APPRAISER AND THE INSURER'S APPRAISER OR OF THE COURT'S OWN
CHOOSING.
(III) THE AMOUNT AGREED UPON IS THE AMOUNT OF LOSS. IF THE
APPRAISERS FAIL TO AGREE, THE DIFFERENCES BETWEEN THE APPRAISALS
MUST BE SUBMITTED TO THE UMPIRE. THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF ANY TWO
OF THE THREE PARTICIPANTS IN THE APPRAISAL PROCESS WILL SET THE
AMOUNT OF LOSS. THE APPRAISAL PROCESS MUST BE RESOLVED BY THE
APPRAISERS, OR AN APPRAISER AND THE UMPIRE, WITHIN ONE HUNDRED
TWENTY DAYS AFTER THE SELECTION OF THE UMPIRE.
(IV) THE APPRAISAL PROCESS AND AUTHORITY GRANTED TO THE
APPRAISERS OR UMPIRE MAY BE EXPANDED OR MODIFIED ONLY BY
WRITTEN, MUTUAL CONSENT SIGNED BY BOTH THE INSURED AND INSURER;
AND
(V) WITH RESPECT TO PAYMENT FOR SERVICES AND EXPENSES
RELATING TO THE APPRAISAL PROCESS, EACH PARTY SHALL:
(A) PAY ITS OWN APPRAISER;
(B) PAY THE EXPENSES FOR ATTORNEYS OR CONSULTANTS
RETAINED BY THE PARTY; AND
(C) SHARE EQUALLY THE EXPENSES OF THE UMPIRE.
(5) UNTIL THE APPRAISAL PROCESS IS CONCLUDED, THE
FOLLOWING POLICY OR CONTRACT TIMELINES ARE TOLLED:
(a) THE RECOVERING OF APPLICABLE REPLACEMENT COST VALUE
BENEFITS, CODE COVERAGES, AND ADDITIONAL COVERAGES;
(b) THE TIME LIMIT WITHIN WHICH AN INSURED MAY BRING SUIT
-6- HB26-1247

AGAINST THE INSURER; AND
(c) THE TIME LIMIT WITHIN WHICH AN INSURED MUST MAKE THE
REPAIRS.
(6) (a) A HOMEOWNER'S INSURANCE POLICY OR CONTRACT,
INCLUDING ANY ENDORSEMENT, MUST NOT INCLUDE A PROVISION THAT
PROHIBITS AN INSURED FROM CONTRACTING WITH A PUBLIC ADJUSTER OR
ATTORNEY FOR SERVICES.
(b) AN INSURED IS NOT REQUIRED TO ENTER INTO A CONTRACT
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (6)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(7) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION CONSTITUTES AN UNFAIR
METHOD OF COMPETITION OR AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACT OR PRACTICE
IN THE BUSINESS OF INSURANCE PURSUANT TO SECTION 10-3-1104 (1)(uu).
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2027; except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general
assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November
2026 and, in such case, will take effect January 1, 2027, or on the date of
the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor, whichever is
later.
(2) This act applies to policies or contracts of homeowner's
insurance issued or renewed on or after the applicable effective date of
this act.
-7- HB26-1247